Utah statutes.
70A-1a-201.   General definitions.
(1)  Unless the context otherwise requires, words or phrases defined in this
section, or in the additional definitions contained in other chapters of this
title that apply to particular chapters or parts thereof, have the meanings
stated.
(2)  Subject to definitions contained in other chapters of this title that
apply to particular chapters or parts thereof:
(a)  "Action," in the sense of a judicial proceeding, includes recoupment,
counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity, and any other proceeding in which
rights are determined.
(b)  "Aggrieved party" means a party entitled to pursue a remedy.
(c)  "Agreement," as distinguished from "contract," means the bargain of the
parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other
circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of
trade as provided in Section 70A-1a-303.
(d)  "Bank" means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a
savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company.
(e)  "Bearer" means a person in possession of a negotiable instrument,
document of title, or certificated security that is payable to bearer or
indorsed in blank.
(f)  "Bill of lading" means a document evidencing the receipt of goods for
shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of transporting or
forwarding goods.
(g)  "Branch" includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of a bank.
(h)  "Burden of establishing" a fact means the burden of persuading the trier
of fact that the existence of the fact is more probable than its nonexistence.
(i)  "Buyer in ordinary course of business" means a person that buys goods in
good faith, without knowledge that the sale violates the rights of another
person in the goods, and in the ordinary course from a person, other than a
pawnbroker, in the business of selling goods of that kind.  A person buys
goods in the ordinary course if the sale to the person comports with the usual
or customary practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged
or with the seller's own usual or customary practices.  A person that sells
oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the
business of selling goods of that kind.  A buyer in ordinary course of
business may buy for cash, by exchange of other property, or on secured or
unsecured credit, and may acquire goods or documents of title under a
preexisting contract for sale.  Only a buyer that takes possession of the
goods or has a right to recover the goods from the seller under Chapter 2,
Uniform Commercial Code - Sales, may be a buyer in ordinary course of
business.  "Buyer in ordinary course of business" does not include a person
that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or
partial satisfaction of a money debt.
(j)  "Conspicuous," with reference to a term, means so written, displayed, or
presented that a reasonable person against which it is to operate ought to
have noticed it.  Whether a term is conspicuous or not is a decision for the
court.  Conspicuous terms include the following:
(i)  a heading in capitals equal to or greater in size than the surrounding
text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the
same or lesser size; and
(ii)  language in the body of a record or display in larger type than the
surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding
text of the same size, or set off from surrounding text of the same size by
symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.
(k)  "Consumer" means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily
for personal, family, or household purposes.
(l)  "Contract," as distinguished from "agreement," means the total legal
obligation that results from the parties' agreement as determined by this
title as supplemented by any other applicable laws.
(m)  "Creditor" includes a general creditor, a secured creditor, a lien
creditor, and any representative of creditors, including an assignee for the
benefit of creditors, a trustee in bankruptcy, a receiver in equity, and an
executor or administrator of an insolvent debtor's or assignor's estate.
(n)  "Defendant" includes a person in the position of defendant in a
counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim.
(o)  "Delivery," with respect to an instrument, document of title, or chattel
paper, means voluntary transfer of possession.
(p)  "Document of title" includes bill of lading, dock warrant, dock receipt,
warehouse receipt or order for the delivery of goods, and also any other
document which in the regular course of business or financing is treated as
adequately evidencing that the person in possession of it is entitled to
receive, hold, and dispose of the document and the goods it covers.  To be a
document of title, a document must purport to be issued by or addressed to a
bailee and purport to cover goods in the bailee's possession which are either
identified or are fungible portions of an identified mass.
(q)  "Fault" means a default, breach, or wrongful act or omission.
(r)  "Fungible goods" means:
(i)  goods of which any unit, by nature or usage of trade, is the equivalent
of any other like unit; or
(ii)  goods that by agreement are treated as equivalent.
(s)  "Genuine" means free of forgery or counterfeiting.
(t)  "Good faith" means honesty in fact in the conduct or transaction
concerned.
(u)  "Holder" means:
(i)  the person in possession of a negotiable instrument that is payable
either to bearer or to an identified person that is the person in possession;
or
(ii)  the person in possession of a document of title if the goods are
deliverable either to bearer or to the order of the person in possession.
(v)  "Insolvency proceeding" includes an assignment for the benefit of
creditors or other proceeding intended to liquidate or rehabilitate the estate
of the person involved.
(w)  "Insolvent" means:
(i)  having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business
other than as a result of bona fide dispute;
(ii)  being unable to pay debts as they become due; or
(iii)  being insolvent within the meaning of federal bankruptcy law.
(x)  "Money" means a medium of exchange currently authorized or adopted by a
domestic or foreign government.  The term includes a monetary unit of account
established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two
or more countries.
(y)  "Organization" means a person other than an individual.
(z)  "Party," as distinguished from "third party," means a person that has
engaged in a transaction or made an agreement subject to this title.
(aa)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(bb)  "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or more
sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain by use of either an
interest rate specified by the parties if that rate is not manifestly
unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into or, if an interest
rate is not so specified, a commercially reasonable rate that takes into
account the facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered
into.
(cc)  "Purchase" means taking by sale, lease, discount, negotiation, mortgage,
pledge, lien, security interest, issue or reissue, gift, or any other
voluntary transaction creating an interest in property.
(dd)  "Purchaser" means a person that takes by purchase.
(ee)  "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or
that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in
perceivable form.
(ff)  "Remedy" means any remedial right to which an aggrieved party is
entitled with or without resort to a tribunal.
(gg)  "Representative" means a person empowered to act for another, including
an agent, an officer of a corporation or association, and a trustee, executor,
or administrator of an estate.
(hh)  "Right" includes remedy.
(ii)  "Security interest" means an interest in personal property or fixtures
which secures payment or performance of an obligation.  "Security interest"
includes any interest of a consignor and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a
payment intangible, or a promissory note in a transaction that is subject to
Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured Transactions.  "Security
interest" does not include the special property interest of a buyer of goods
on identification of those goods to a contract for sale under Section
70A-2-401, but a buyer may also acquire a "security interest" by complying
with Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured Transactions.  Except as
otherwise provided in Section 70A-2-505, the right of a seller or lessor of
goods under Chapter 2, Uniform Commercial Code - Sales, or 2A, Uniform
Commercial Code - Leases, to retain or acquire possession of the goods is not
a "security interest," but a seller or lessor may also acquire a "security
interest" by complying with Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured
Transactions.  The retention or reservation of title by a seller of goods
notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer under Section 70A-2-401 is
limited in effect to a reservation of a "security interest." Whether a
transaction in the form of a lease creates a "security interest" is determined
pursuant to Section 70A-1a-203.
(jj)  "Send" in connection with a writing, record, or notice means:
(i)  to deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by any other usual
means of communication with postage or cost of transmission provided for and
properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument, to an address specified
thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there be none to any address reasonable
under the circumstances; or
(ii)  in any other way to cause to be received any record or notice within the
time it would have arrived if properly sent.
(kk)  "Signed" includes using any symbol executed or adopted with present
intention to adopt or accept a writing.
(ll)  "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(mm)  "Surety" includes a guarantor or other secondary obligor.
(nn)  "Term" means a portion of an agreement that relates to a particular
matter.
(oo)  "Unauthorized signature" means a signature made without actual, implied,
or apparent authority.  The term includes a forgery.
(pp)  "Warehouse receipt" means a receipt issued by a person engaged in the
business of storing goods for hire.
(qq)  "Writing" includes printing, typewriting, or any other intentional
reduction to tangible form.  "Written" has a corresponding meaning.
